Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 33.1 Community College of Rhode Island
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-33.1-1.
Management by board of governors for higher education.

The Community College of Rhode Island shall be under the management of the board of governors for higher education as provided by chapter 59 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 24, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 56.

16-33.1-2.
Purposes of community college.

The governors, as now constituted, and their successors, for the terms for which they have been or for which they hereafter may be appointed trustees, shall continue to be a body politic and corporate for the purpose of continuing and maintaining the Community College of Rhode Island as a junior college and a workforce development center, the chief purpose of which shall be to offer all students the opportunity to acquire the knowledge and skills necessary for intellectual, professional and personal growth by providing an array of academic, career and lifelong learning programs, while contributing to Rhode Island’s economic development and the needs of the region’s workforce.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 24, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 99, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 104, § 1.

16-33.1-2.1.
Additional powers of the President of the College.

In addition to any powers granted to the president of the Community College of Rhode Island by law or regulation, and consistent with shared governance practices, in conformity with §

16-33.1-3

, the president shall have the following additional powers and duties:

To create and consolidate departments, divisions, programs, and courses of study within the college with the assistance of the commissioner of postsecondary education within the approved role and scope adopted by the council on postsecondary education pursuant to §

16-59-4

. Any new or proposed eliminations of departments, divisions, programs or courses of study that are outside the role and scope approved by the council shall require the review and approval of the council on postsecondary education.

To adopt a budget for the college and submit it to the council on postsecondary education for approval.

To be responsible for the general management of property of the college.

To recommend to the council on postsecondary education, after consultation with the commissioner of postsecondary education, tables of organization for the college.

To submit to the office of postsecondary commissioner and to compile and analyze the following information for presentation to the council on postsecondary education and the board of education annually by May 1 the following:

A detailed departmental breakdown of all faculty members employed at the college by rank (including all professors, associate professors, assistant professors, lecturers, and instructors) and tenure (tenured and non-tenured, and other) and by race (African American, Hispanic, Native American, and Asian) and gender.

A detailed report on current student enrollments for each class at the college by race and gender, by academic department, and by outreach program (e.g. talent development), guaranteed admissions program, and the current levels of funding and staff support for each of these programs.

A report on the current status of the African and Afro-American studies programs at the college and a five (5) year budgetary history of the programs along with projections for budgetary support for the next two (2) years.

A plan for recruitment of African American and Hispanic faculty into tenure track positions at the college with specific reference to and planned involvement with the New England higher education’s minority faculty recruitment and development plan.

Copies of the report shall be furnished to the council on postsecondary education and the board of education.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 20, § 4.

16-33.1-3.
Award of degrees — Curriculum and government.

The board of governors, with the approval of the president and a committee of the faculty of the community college, shall award associate degrees, certificates, and diplomas and confer honors in the same manner as is customary in American junior colleges and community colleges. It shall also be the duty of the president and a committee of the faculty, with the approval of the board of governors, to arrange courses of study, prescribe any qualifications for the admission of students and any rules of study, exercise, discipline, and government as the president and committee may deem proper.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 24, § 1.

16-33.1-4.
Diploma on graduation.

Persons who shall have passed the regular course of studies at the Community College of Rhode Island shall, on the written recommendation of the president, receive a diploma issued by the board of governors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 24, § 1.

16-33.1-5.
Doctor William F. Flanagan Campus.

The Blackstone Valley campus of the Community College of Rhode Island shall be named the Doctor William F. Flanagan campus.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 24, § 1.

16-33.1-6.
Statutory references — Former name.

When in any existing law reference is made to Rhode Island Junior College and where in existing law the term “junior college,” “college,” “said junior college,” or “said college,” as variously used, refers to “Rhode Island Junior College,” the reference and the term shall be deemed to refer to the Community College of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 24, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 5; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 44.